Washington statutes.
RCW 35.67.180

Revenue bonds—Remedy of owners.

If a city or town fails to set aside and pay into the special fund created for the payment of revenue bonds and warrants the amount which it has obligated itself in the ordinance creating the fund to set aside and pay therein, the owner of any bond or warrant issued against the fund may bring suit against the city or town to compel it to do so.

[ 1983 c 167 s 61; 1965 c 7 s 35.67.180. Prior: 1941 c 193 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1941 c 9354-7, part.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.